Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1184
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the State Government Recycling Management Act and the public policy of this state to recognize the importance of limited natural resources, to prevent waste, and to promote the most energy-saving and resource-saving use of state government recyclable material and the most efficient and economical method of recycling and disposing of such recyclable material.

Laws 1986, LB 380, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-1140.02;

Laws 1990, LB 987, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 81-1643;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 37.